Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-328
Annual public hearing; notice; fund level.

(1) Annually the commission shall hold a public hearing to determine the level of the fund necessary to carry out the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act. The commission shall publish notice of the hearing in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the state at least once each week for two consecutive weeks before the hearing. After the hearing, the commission shall determine the amount of the fund for the following year, including a reasonable reserve. In the initial year of the fund's operation, the commission shall determine the amount of the fund to be equivalent to the amount which, in the commission's judgment, after careful analysis, is necessary to keep approximately ninety-six percent of Nebraska households subscribed to local telecommunications service.

(2) In an emergency as determined by the commission, the commission may adjust the level of the fund, but only after a public hearing for such purpose.

Laws 1997, LB 686, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1409;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 206.

Annual report to Legislature, see section 86-163.